Louisiana, session 2026, HB636.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as "The Caleb Wilson Hazing
Prevention Act."
Section 2. R.S. 17:1801 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1801. Hazing prohibited; reporting; documentation documentation; education;
policies; new student orientation; organizations
A. Definitions. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the
following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
(1)(a) "Hazing" means any intentional, knowing, or reckless act committed
by a person acting alone or with others that is directed against another individual,
when both of the following apply:
(i) The actor knew or reasonably should have known that the act endangered
the physical health or safety of the other individual or caused severe emotional
distress.
(ii) The act was associated with pledging, initiation into, affiliation with,
participation in, holding office in, or maintaining membership in any organization.
(b) "Hazing" includes but is not limited to any of the following acts
associated with pledging, initiation, affiliation, participation, holding office, or
maintaining membership in any organization:
(i) Physical brutality including but not limited to beating, branding, electric
shocking, paddling, placing a harmful substance on the body, striking, or similar
activity.
(ii) Physical activity that subjects an individual to an unreasonable risk of
harm, adversely affects physical health or safety, or causes severe emotional distress
including but not limited to calisthenics, confinement in a small space, exposure to
the elements, and sleep deprivation.
(iii) Activity involving the consumption of food, liquid, or any other
substance, including but not limited to alcohol or drugs, that subjects the individual
to an unreasonable risk of harm, adversely affects physical health or safety, or causes
severe emotional distress.
(iv) Activity that induces, causes, or requires an individual to commit a
crime or engage in an act that constitutes hazing under this Section.
(c) A physical activity that is normal, customary, and necessary for training
and participation in an athletic, physical education, military training, or similar
program officially sanctioned by the postsecondary education institution shall not be
considered hazing for purposes of this Section.
(2) "Hearing panel" means a body designated by a postsecondary education
institution pursuant to its student code of conduct to adjudicate alleged hazing
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
violations, and to determine responsibility and recommend or impose sanctions when
suspension or expulsion may be a possible outcome.
(3)(a) "Organization" means any group whose members are primarily
students at, or former students of, a postsecondary education institution including but
not limited to the following:
(i) An association.
(ii) An athletic team.
(iii) A band.
(iv) A club.
(v) A cooperative.
(vi) A corporation.
(vii) A corps.
(viii) A fraternity.
(ix) An order.
(x) A service group.
(xi) A social group.
(xii) A spirit group.
(xiii) A society.
(xiv) A sorority.
(xv) Any similar group.
(b) "Organization" includes any national, regional, or parent organization of
which an entity listed in this Paragraph is a sanctioned, recognized, or affiliated
member at the time an incident of hazing occurs.
(4) "Pledging" means any action or activity related to becoming a member
of an organization, including recruitment, rushing, and initiation-related activities.
(5) "Postsecondary education institution", "education institution", and
"institution" mean any postsecondary education institution in this state supported
wholly or in part by public funds.
(6) "Student organizational advisor" means an individual who is a faculty or
staff member at an institution, or other adult who is designated by an institution or
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
by a student organization, to provide guidance, support, and advice to a student
organization relative to conducting the organization's activities, programs, and
meetings.
B. Hazing prohibited; education; resources. (1) Hazing in any form, or the
use of any method of initiation into organizations in any education institution
supported wholly or in part by public funds, which is likely to cause bodily danger
or physical punishment to any student or other of any person attending any such an
education institution is prohibited.
B. (2) Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be expelled,
suspended, or dismissed from the education institution and not permitted to return
for at least one semester, quarter, or comparable academic period. In addition, the
person violating the provisions of this Section may also be subject to the provisions
of R.S. 14:40.8 which provides penalties for certain hazing activities.
(3)(a) Beginning in the fall semester of 2027, and annually thereafter, each
student shall be provided education information on the dangers of and prohibition
on hazing either in-person or electronically.
(b) In addition to the requirement in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, each
new student shall be provided educational information on the dangers of and
prohibition on hazing during the new student orientation process either in-person or
electronically.
(c) If a student is a minor, the information shall be provided to his parent or
legal guardian.
(4)(a) Each institution and organization shall make available and provide
information about resources to a student who is an alleged victim of hazing,
including information on how to access medical and reporting resources and
counseling that the institution or community offers.
(b) Each institution shall incorporate the requirements of this Section into
its hazing prevention policies as required by Subsection D of this Section.
C. Reporting; data publication. (1) If an organization has taken disciplinary
action against one of its members members, representatives, or officers for hazing
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
or has reason to believe that any member of the organization has participated in an
incident of hazing, the organization shall report the incident to law enforcement in
accordance with R.S. 14:40.8 and the institution with which it is affiliated.
(2) If an organization or any of its members members, representatives, or
officers has been disciplined by a parent organization for hazing, the organization
shall report the hazing for which the organization was disciplined to the institution
with which it is affiliated.
(3) If an organization fails to report an incident of hazing as required by this
Section, the institution shall impose a disciplinary action against the organization in
accordance with institutional policies.
(2) (4) When the institution receives a report of an alleged incident of
hazing pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the institution
shall do both of the following:
(a) Report to law enforcement as required by R.S. 14:40.8. The information
reported to law enforcement shall include all information and details received by the
institution relative to the alleged incident, with no information being redacted,
including the name of all individuals alleged to have committed the act or acts of
hazing identified in the report.
(b) Document in writing all actions taken with regard to the report including
but not limited to the date the report was received, reports made to law enforcement
as provided in R.S. 14:40.8, and any other information relative to the institution's
investigation, processing, and resolution of the incident.
(3) (5) The Board of Regents, in consultation with the public postsecondary
education management boards, in consultation with the Board of Regents, shall
develop the following:
(a) A standardized form that organizations shall may use in making the
reports required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(b) A standardized form that institutions shall may use to document such
reports, reports made to law enforcement as provided in R.S. 14:40.8, and the
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
manner in which each hazing incident is handled and resolved at the institution level.
However, an institution may use third party reporting software in lieu of such form.
(c) A policy relative to making available to the public certain information
relative to hazing that is documented pursuant to this Paragraph.
D. For purposes of this Section and R.S. 17:1801.1:
(1)(a) "Hazing" means any intentional, knowing, or reckless act by a person
acting alone or acting with others that is directed against another when both of the
following apply:
(i) The person knew or should have known that such an act endangers the
physical health or safety of the other person or causes severe emotional distress.
(ii) The act was associated with pledging, being initiated into, affiliating
with, participating in, holding office in, or maintaining membership in any
organization.
(b) "Hazing" includes but is not limited to any of the following acts
associated with pledging, being initiated into, affiliating with, participating in,
holding office in, or maintaining membership in any organization:
(i) Physical brutality, such as whipping, beating, paddling, striking, branding,
electric shocking, placing of a harmful substance on the body, or similar activity.
(ii) Physical activity, such as sleep deprivation, exposure to the elements,
confinement in a small space, or calisthenics, that subjects the other person to an
unreasonable risk of harm or that adversely affects the physical health or safety of
the individual or causes severe emotional distress.
(iii) Activity involving consumption of food, liquid, or any other substance,
including but not limited to an alcoholic beverage or drug, that subjects the
individual to an unreasonable risk of harm or that adversely affects the physical
health or safety of the individual or causes severe emotional distress.
(iv) Activity that induces, causes, or requires an individual to perform a duty
or task that involves the commission of a crime or an act of hazing.
(c) A physical activity that is normal, customary, and necessary for a
person's training and participation in an athletic, physical education, military
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
training, or similar program sanctioned by the postsecondary education institution
is not considered "hazing" for purposes of this Section.
(2) "Organization" means a fraternity, sorority, association, corporation,
order, society, corps, cooperative, club, service group, social group, band, spirit
group, athletic team, or similar group whose members are primarily students at, or
former students of, a postsecondary education institution. "Organization" includes
the national or parent organization of which any of the underlying entities provided
for in this Paragraph is a sanctioned or recognized member at the time of the hazing.
(3) "Pledging" means any action or activity related to becoming a member
of an organization, including recruitment and rushing.
(4) "Postsecondary education institution", "education institution", and
"institution" mean any postsecondary education institution in this state supported
wholly or in part by public funds.
(6) Online publication. (a) Each institution shall maintain a publicly
accessible website that discloses conduct findings and disciplinary sanctions imposed
on organizations recognized or affiliated with the institution, provided that
personally identifiable information of individuals shall be redacted pursuant to
Subparagraph (e) of this Paragraph.
(b) At a minimum, for each organization that the institution found
responsible for a policy or code violation, the website shall include the following:
(i) The name of the organization.
(ii) Each specific policy listed in the institutional student code of conduct
that the organization violated.
(iii) A brief description of the violation, presented in a manner that protects
individual privacy.
(iv) The date on or academic term in which the organization violated policy.
(v) The disciplinary sanctions the institution imposed on the organization.
(vi) The current disciplinary status of the organization.
(c) The institution shall update the information on the website required by
this Section at least once per academic semester no later than April tenth and October
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
tenth and additionally as new violations are adjudicated or sanctions are modified or
imposed.
(d) Each institution shall determine a minimum period of time for which
disciplinary records and status information shall remain publicly available. This
period of time shall not be shorter than the duration of the sanction and any
probationary period.
(e) Privacy Protections. The information that the institution posts on the
publicly accessible website shall exclude the names and personally identifiable
information of individual students and shall comply with all applicable state and
federal privacy laws.
(f) Applicability. This Paragraph applies to all organizations as defined in
this Section.
(g) The management boards shall send an annual systemwide summary
report of the information contained in this Paragraph to the Board of Regents by
January thirtieth.
(h) The Board of Regents shall submit a report of a summary of the
information in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph to the House and Senate
committees on education, the House Committee on the Administration of Criminal
Justice, the House Committee on Civil Law and Procedure, and the House and
Senate select committees on women and children by February twenty-eighth
annually. The report shall also include any recommendations for legislation. The
Board of Regents shall publish the report on its website.
D. Hazing prevention policy. (1) The Board of Regents, in consultation
with each postsecondary management board, shall establish uniform policies and
best practices to implement measures to address the reporting of hazing on
institutional campuses and the prevention of hazing.
(2) Each postsecondary education management board shall institute policies
incorporating the policies and best practices prescribed by the Board of Regents
regarding the prevention of and reporting of hazing committed by or against students
of an institution. The policies, at a minimum, shall provide for the following:
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
(a) Online reporting. Each institution shall provide an online reporting
system permitting third-party reporting, allowing any individual to submit a
confidential or anonymous report of a witnessed or known incident of hazing,
regardless of whether the reporting individual is the person directly impacted.
(b) Immunities. A person acting in good faith who reports or assists in the
investigation of a report of an incident of hazing, or who testifies or otherwise
participates in a disciplinary process or judicial proceeding arising from such a
report, shall not be subjected to any disciplinary action by the institution in which the
person is enrolled or employed for any violation of the institution's code of conduct
that is reasonably related to the incident, provided that suspension or expulsion from
the institution is not a possible punishment for the violation. This Subparagraph
shall not apply to a person who perpetrates or assists in the perpetration of a reported
hazing incident.
(c) False reporting. An individual who is determined by the institution's
disciplinary procedures to have knowingly, with the intent to harm or deceive, made
a report that is knowingly false shall be sanctioned in accordance with the
institution's code of conduct or any other applicable institutional policies.
(d) Amnesty policy. The institution shall provide amnesty to any student
who reports hazing to the institution in good faith. Such student shall not be
sanctioned by the institution for a nonviolent student conduct violation, such as
underage drinking, that is revealed in the course of such a report.
(e) Training. (i) Each organization shall do the following:
(aa) Annually complete at least two hours of hazing prevention education
training, in person, electronically, or both, that includes education relative to such
policies to all members and anyone who is employed by or volunteers at the
organization.
(bb) Submit a training completion report annually to the institution with
which it is affiliated identifying the students, employees, and volunteers who
received the education, evidenced by an attestation of such individuals receiving the
education.
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
(cc) The institution shall deactivate the organization's operation on campus
if it fails to comply with the provisions of this Subsection.
(ii)(aa) Student organizational advisors. Each individual designated by an
institution or organization to serve as an advisor shall annually complete, at a
minimum, one hour of hazing prevention education training prior to serving as an
advisor or in an advisory capacity.
(bb) The training specific to organizational advisors shall include, at a
minimum, an overview of applicable hazing laws and institutional policies, reporting
obligations, and advisor responsibilities related to the prevention of hazing.
(cc) Organizational advisors shall submit a training completion report to the
institution evidenced by an attestation of such individuals receiving the education.
(iii) Hearing Panel. (aa) Each individual serving on an institutional hearing
panel or disciplinary body responsible for adjudicating alleged hazing violations
shall annually complete hazing prevention education training prior to service on the
panel.
(bb) The training shall be a minimum of one hour in duration and shall
include instruction on hazing definitions and indicators, applicable laws and policies,
trauma-informed practices, due process considerations, and sanctioning standards.
(cc) Hearing panelists shall submit a training completion report to the
institution evidenced by an attestation of such individuals receiving the education.
(3) Each institution shall adopt a hazing prevention policy and the policy
shall be published on the institution's website.
(4) Each organization shall, as a condition of operating at an institution,
adopt the hazing prevention policy that the institution has adopted pursuant to
Paragraph (3) of this Subsection and shall provide a copy of the policy, either
electronically or in writing, to each member and prospective member prior to
initiation, acceptance, or participation in organizational activities.
E. Penalties for noncompliance. (1) The penalties for noncompliance with
the provisions of this Section are as follows:
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 636 ENROLLED
(a) Institutions. An institution's failure to comply with the provisions of this
Section shall result in a prohibition, for a period of two years following notice of
such noncompliance, on the State Bond Commission authorizing the institution to
incur any debt subject to the commission's approval.
(b) Organizations. (i) If an organization is in violation of this Section, it
shall be subject to disciplinary action by the institution, which may include
suspension, expulsion, deactivation, loss of recognition, or other sanctions deemed
appropriate.
(ii) If a violation by an organization of this Section results in the death of a
person, the institution shall banish the organization and prohibit re-chartering, re-
establishing, or operating under any name, alias, or affiliated organization.
Section 3. R.S. 17:1801.1 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.